Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,134
False statement or report; unlawful; penalty.

In addition to penalties otherwise provided in the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, any person who files a statement or report required under the act knowing that information contained in the statement or report is false or that the verification statement required on the document is false shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 134;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 58;

Laws 1999, LB 581, § 4.